Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4732.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 50c. (1) As used in this section: (a) "Dog handler" means a peace officer who has successfully completed training in the handling of a police dog pursuant to a policy of the law enforcement agency that employs that peace officer. (b) "Physical harm" means any injury to a dog's or horse's physical condition. (c) "Police dog" means a dog used by a law enforcement agency of this state or of a local unit of government of this state that is trained for law enforcement work and subject to the control of a dog handler. (d) "Police horse" means a horse used by a law enforcement agency of this state or of a local unit of government of this state for law enforcement work. (e) "Search and rescue dog" means a dog that is trained for, being trained for, or engaged in a search and rescue operation. (f) "Search and rescue operation" means an effort conducted at the direction of an agency of this state or of a political subdivision of this state to locate or rescue a lost, injured, or deceased individual. (g) "Serious physical harm" means any injury to a dog's or horse's physical condition or welfare that is not necessarily permanent but that constitutes substantial body disfigurement, or that seriously impairs the function of a body organ or limb. (2) A person shall not intentionally kill or cause serious physical harm to a police dog or police horse or a search and rescue dog. (3) A person shall not intentionally cause physical harm to a police dog or police horse or a search and rescue dog. (4) A person shall not intentionally harass or interfere with a police dog or police horse or search and rescue dog lawfully performing its duties. (5) A person who is committing or attempting to commit a crime shall not kill or cause serious physical harm to a police dog or police horse or a search and rescue dog. (6) (5) A person who violates subsection (2) is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 5 years, or a fine of not more than $10,000.00, or both. (7) (6) Except as provided in subsection (7), (8), a person who violates subsection (3) or (4) is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 1 year, or a fine of not more than $5,000.00, or both. (8) (7) A person who violates subsection (3) or (4) while committing a crime is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 2 years, or a fine of not more than $15,000.00, or both. (9) A person who violates subsection (5) is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 2 years, a fine of not more than $10,000.00, or both. (10) (8) This section does not prohibit an individual from being charged with, convicted of, or punished for any other violation of law committed by that individual while violating this section. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act may be known as "Dozer's law". Enacting section 2. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law.